Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.320

Contracting for services—Employees in classified service—Procedures and criteria.

An agency, department, or institution of higher education that intends to contract out, or does contract out, for services that, on or after July 1, 2005, have been customarily and historically performed by employees in the classified service defined in RCW 41.06.020 must follow procedures and meet criteria established under RCW 41.06.142.

[ 2020 c 269 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—Application—2020 c 269: See notes following RCW 41.06.142.